Utah statutes.
35A-3-310.   Child care services.
(1)  A parent client may receive assistance for child care under this part for
a minor child in the care and custody of the parent client, unless the other
parent in a two-parent family:
(a)  is capable of caring for the family’s child;
(b)  is not employed; and
(c)  has not entered into an employment plan with the division.
(2)  The division shall encourage a parent client to obtain child care at no
cost from a parent, sibling, relative, or other suitable provider.
(3)  Within appropriations from the Legislature and in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make
rules governing eligibility for child care services for a minor child in the
care and custody of a parent who does not receive cash assistance under this
part.
